New Jersey, session 222, A4390.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2025, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 34 DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 31 Direct Educational Services and Assistance STATE AID 02-5120  Nonpublic School Aid ....................................... $20,235,000 Total State Aid Appropriation, Direct Educational Services and Assistance $20,235,000 State Aid: 02    Nonpublic Security Aid...................... ($20,235,000) From the amount hereinabove appropriated for Nonpublic Security Aid, the Commissioner of Education shall provide State aid to each school district in an amount equal to [$205] $338 multiplied by the number of nonpublic school students within the district identified by the district on or before November 5 for security services, equipment, or technology to ensure a safe and secure school environment for nonpublic school students. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.